Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF307.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1150HV (2) 91 jm/jh H.F. 307 Section 1. Section 422D.6, subsection 3, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . i. (1) The salaries or wages of emergency 3 medical care providers providing emergency medical services. 4 (2) As used in this paragraph, âemergency medical care 5 providerâ and âemergency medical servicesâ mean the same as 6 defined in section 147A.1. 7 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 8 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 9